Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1531.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study the feasibility of funding
emergency medical services through a universal health care model that would include:
(a) A mix of public and private resources;
(b) State funding and oversight;
(c) Allocation of funding to counties and county-level oversight; and
(d) Delegated local control.
(2) The authority shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to emergency management no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 275